District of Columbia statutes.
10-503.21

Employees to assist enforcement authorities.

It shall be the duty of all persons employed in the service of the government in the Capitol or in the United States Capitol Grounds to prevent, as far as may be in their power, offenses against this part, and to aid the police, by information or otherwise, in securing the arrest and conviction of offenders.

July 31, 1946, 60 Stat. 719, ch. 707, § 10
1973 Ed., § 9-127.
1981 Ed., § 9-123.